Massachusetts, session 194th, S1712.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 22E the following
chapter:-
CHAPTER 22F.
PUBLIC SAFETY BUILDING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
Section 1. Whereas the costs of the building police stations, fire stations, and other public
safety facilities are increasing at an unsustainable rate and local governments need flexibility in
public safety building assistance to ensure that local needs for public safety facility space,
downtown development, open space and community space are met; and to promote the
thoughtful planning and construction of public safety facility space in order to insure safe and
of 6

adequate plant facilities for the public safety facilities, and to assist towns in meeting the cost
thereof, there is hereby established a public safety building assistance program. It is in the best
interests of the commonwealth and its citizens to create an authority to achieve the objectives of
effective management and planning of the commonwealth's investments in public safety building
assets, maintaining good repair, efficient and economical construction and maintenance,
financial sustainability of the public safety building assistance program, thoughtful community
development, and accessibility.
Section 2. (a) There is hereby created a body politic and corporate and a public
instrumentality to be known as the Massachusetts Public Safety Building Authority, which shall
be an independent public authority not subject to the supervision and control of any other
executive office, department, commission, board, bureau, agency or political subdivision of the
commonwealth except as specifically provided in any general or special law. The exercise by the
authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be considered to be the performance of an
essential public function.
(b) The purpose of this authority would be to oversee a public facilities building program
to provide state building assistance for the new construction, renovation, or remodeling of police
stations, fire stations, and other public safety facilities.
(c) The authority shall consist of the state treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson, the
secretary of administration and finance, the secretary of the executive office of public safety and
security, and 4 additional members appointed by the state treasurer, 2 of whom shall have
practical experience in public safety facilities planning, public safety facilitiy construction, or
architecture and public safety facility design, and 2 of whom shall be persons in the field of law
of 6

enforcement or fire management, each of whom shall serve a term of 2 years; but, a person
appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. An appointed member of the
authority shall be eligible for reappointment. The authority shall annually elect 1 of its members
to serve as vice-chairperson. Each member of the authority serving ex officio may appoint a
designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30.
(d) Four members of the authority shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of 4
members of the authority shall be necessary and sufficient for any action taken by the authority.
No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all
the rights and duties of the authority. Members shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed
for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. The chairperson of
the authority shall report to the governor and to the general court no less than annually, to assist
the executive and legislative branches in coordinating public safety and fiscal policies of the
commonwealth.
(e) Any action of the authority may take effect immediately and need not be published or
posted unless otherwise provided by law. The authority shall be subject to all provisions of
chapter 30A, and records pertaining to the administration of the authority shall be subject to
section 42 of chapter 30 and section 10 of chapter 66. All moneys of the authority shall be
considered to be public funds for purposes of chapter 12A. The operations of the authority shall
be subject to chapter 268A and chapter 268B and all other operational or administrative
standards or requirements to the same extent as the office of the state treasurer.
SECTION 2. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 35SSS, the following section:-
of 6

Section 35TTT. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
"Authority", the Massachusetts Municipal Building Authority.
"Dedicated sales tax revenue amount", all moneys received by the commonwealth equal
to 0.5 per cent of the receipts from sales, as defined by chapter 64H, and 0.5 per cent of the sales
price of purchases, as defined by chapter 64I, from that portion of the taxes imposed under said
chapters 64H and 64I as excises upon the sale and use at retail of tangible property or of services,
and upon the storage, use or other consumption of tangible property or of services, including
interest thereon or penalties, but not including any portion of the taxes that constitute special
receipts within the meaning of subsection (b 1/2) of section 10 of chapter 152 of the acts of 1997
or within the meaning of subsection (b½) of said section 10 of said chapter 152 or any portion of
the taxes imposed on the sale of meals as defined in paragraph (h) of section 6 of said chapter
64H.
"Receipts from sales", gross receipts from nonexempt sales, less amounts abated or
reimbursed.
"Sales price of purchases", sales price of nonexempt purchases, less amounts abated or
reimbursed.
(b) There shall be established on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund, to be
known as the Municipal Building Modernization and Reconstruction Trust Fund. There shall be
credited to the fund the dedicated sales tax revenue amount. Annual receipts into the fund on
account of any fiscal year shall be considered to meet the full obligation of the commonwealth to
the authority for such fiscal year.
of 6

(c) Amounts in the fund shall be held by the state treasurer or his designee, as trustee and
not on account of the commonwealth, exclusively for the purposes of the authority, and the state
treasurer shall disburse amounts in the fund to the authority, without further appropriation, upon
the request from time to time of the executive director of the authority. All amounts in the fund,
including investment earnings, shall be available for expenditure by the authority for any lawful
purpose, including without limitation payment of debt service on debt obligations issued by the
authority, and may be pledged to secure debt of the authority in such manner and according to
such priority as the authority may determine.
(d) The authority shall certify annually to the treasurer as trustee with copies provided to
the clerks of the house and senate and to the house and senate committees on ways and means
that it has made provision in its annual budget and its capital plan under section 17 of chapter
70B for sufficient amounts to be available to meet debt service payments or other payments due
under financing obligations, including, without limitation, leases or grant obligations.
(e) Subject to applicable restrictions contained in any bond resolution, trust or security
agreement or credit enhancement agreement, surety bond or insurance policy related to
indebtedness incurred by the authority, including without limitation coverage requirements, if the
authority shall determine that the balance of the fund exceeds the amount necessary to achieve
the purposes of the authority, including, without limitation, to meet debt service payments, lease
payments and grant obligations, the authority may transfer the excess amount to the
commonwealth.
(f) In order to increase the marketability of any bonds or notes of the trust which may be
secured by or payable from amounts held in the fund, the sums to be credited to the fund are
of 6

hereby impressed with a trust for the benefit of the trust and the holders from time to time of the
bonds or notes, and in consideration of the acceptance of payment for the bonds or notes, the
100 commonwealth covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of the
101 bonds or notes that while the bond or note shall remain outstanding, and so long as the principal
102 of or interest on the bond or note shall remain unpaid, the sums to be credited to the fund shall
103 not be diverted from the control of the trust and, so long as the sums are necessary, as determined
104 by the authority in accordance with any applicable bond resolution, trust or security agreement or
105 credit enhancement agreement, surety bond or insurance policy related to indebtedness incurred
106 by the trust, for the purposes for which they have been pledged, the rates of the excises imposed
107 by said chapters 64H and 64I shall not be reduced below the rates prescribed by this section.
of 6